District of Columbia statutes.
33-110.04

Repealed

Registration and fees.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1004, 44 DCR 777
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2046(b), 57 DCR 181
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2028(b), 57 DCR 6242
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(x), 58 DCR 1720
1981 Ed., § 41-160.4.
Section 208(b) of D.C. Law 18-222 rewrote subsecs. (a) and (b) to read as follows:
“(a) The Mayor may require that a limited liability partnership file a statement of qualification or statement of foreign qualification, or cancellation thereof or amendment thereto, a biennial report, and other relevant statements or documents, on forms provided by the Mayor.
“(b)(1) The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may establish and revise fees and charges for the filing of documents and issuance of certificates and other documents, providing certified copies of statements, recording statements, and for taking other actions under this act.
“(2) The proposed rules issued pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be submitted to the Council for a 90-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 90-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed disapproved.”.
Section 2002(b) of D.C. Law 18-222 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2046(b) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2046(b) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 208(b) of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-450, June 28, 2010, 57 DCR 5635).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 208(b) of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-531, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8109).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2028(b) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).